Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB159.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 134.504 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall be responsible for the collection of certificates of delinquency
and personal property certificates of delinquency. The provisions of this section
relating to certificates of delinquency shall also apply to personal property
certificates of delinquency unless otherwise specifically noted. The department
shall offer the collection duties related to certificates of delinquency and personal
property certificates of delinquency to the county attorney in each county, unless
the department determines that a county attorney has previously failed to perform
collection duties in a reasonable and acceptable manner.
(2) Any county attorney desiring to perform the collection duties shall enter into a
contract with the department on an annual basis.
(3) The terms of the contract shall:
(a) Specify the duties to be undertaken by the county attorney, which shall
include, at a minimum, the duties set forth in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) [. The terms of the contract shall also ]Provide that, if the county attorney fails
to perform the duties required by the contract during the contract period, the
department may assume all collection responsibilities; and
(c) Allow the county attorney the option to enforce collection of a certificate of
delinquency by the procedure authorized in Sections 2 to 20 of this Act.
(4) The following duties shall be performed by the department or the county attorney,
as the case may be, with regard to each certificate of delinquency:
(a) Within thirty (30) days after the establishment of a certificate of delinquency,
the county attorney or the department shall mail a notice by regular mail to the
owner of record on the assessment date at the address on the records of the
property valuation administrator, or to the in-care-of address if an in-care-of
Page 1 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
address is provided as required by subsection (5) of this section. The notice
shall:
1. Include the name, address, and telephone number of a contact person in
the county attorney's office or the department, as the case may be;
2. Advise that:
a. The certificate of delinquency is a lien of record against the
property on which the taxes are due;
b. The amounts due are a personal obligation of the taxpayer on the
assessment date; and
c. The certificate bears interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%)
and, if not paid, will be subject to collection by the county attorney
or the department as provided by law;
3. Include the total amount due as of the date of the notice;
4. Include in bold print in at least twelve (12) point font, a statement
advising the taxpayer that anytime after ninety (90) days from the
creation of the certificate of delinquency, the certificate of delinquency
may be paid by a third-party purchaser and, that if so paid, the certificate
of delinquency will be subject to collection by the third-party purchaser
as provided by law. The notice shall also advise that a third-party
purchaser may impose substantial additional administrative costs and
fees associated with collection in addition to the amount due on the
certificate of delinquency, and that collection actions may include
foreclosure. This provision shall not be included in notices sent for
personal property certificates of delinquency; and
5. Advise that the taxpayer may qualify for a payment plan with the county
attorney or the department, if the taxpayer meets the requirements
established by the county attorney or the department, and if terms are
Page 2 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
agreed to prior to the date of the sale;
(b) The county attorney or the department shall file in the office of the county
clerk a list of the names and addresses to which the thirty (30) day notice was
mailed along with a certificate attesting that the notices were mailed in
accordance with the requirements of this section;
(c) 1. All thirty (30) day notices returned as undeliverable shall be submitted
by the county attorney or department to the property valuation
administrator, and a list of the returned notices shall be filed with the
county clerk, who shall record the list in the order book of the county.
2. The property valuation administrator shall attempt to correct inadequate
or erroneous addresses and, if property has been transferred, shall
determine the new owner, current mailing address, and in-care-of
address, if any, as provided in KRS 382.135.
3. The property valuation administrator shall return the notices with the
corrected information to the county attorney or the department within
twenty (20) days of receipt.
4. Upon receipt of the new information from the property valuation
administrator, the county attorney or the department shall resend the
notice required by paragraph (a) of this subsection using the updated
information;
(d) 1. At least twenty (20) days after the mailing of the thirty (30) day notice
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection, but within sixty (60) days
of the establishment of a certificate of delinquency, the county attorney
or department shall send a second notice, by regular mail, to owners of
record whose tax bills remain delinquent, or to the in-care-of addresses
or corrected address, if information regarding a new property owner has
been received by the county attorney or the department under the
Page 3 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection. The notice shall include,
at a minimum, the following information:
a. The name, address, and telephone number of a contact person in
the county attorney's office or the department, as the case may be;
b. A statement that a sale of tax claims will be held by the county
clerk on the date established by the department for the sale. The
text of the statement shall include the actual sale date, as well as a
statement noting that the certificate of delinquency may be paid by
a third-party purchaser at the sale, and if the certificate of
delinquency is paid by a third-party purchaser, it will be subject to
collection by the third-party purchaser as provided by law, that
significant additional collection fees will be imposed by the third-
party purchaser, and that collection actions may include
foreclosure. This statement shall not be included in notices sent to
owners of property subject to a personal property certificate of
delinquency; and
c. A statement that the taxpayer may qualify for a payment plan with
the county attorney or the department, if the taxpayer meets the
requirements established by the county attorney or the department
and if terms are agreed to prior to the date of the sale.
2. The county attorney or the department shall file in the office of the
county clerk a list of the names and addresses to which the sixty (60)
day notice was mailed, along with a certificate attesting that the notices
were mailed in accordance with the requirements of this section.
3. If the notice required by paragraph (c) of this subsection is returned as
undeliverable, and the property valuation administrator is not able to
provide a corrected or updated address, the county attorney or the
Page 4 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
department shall address the sixty (60) day notice to "Occupant" and
shall mail the notice to the address of the property to which the
certificate of delinquency applies;
(e) The county attorney or the department shall deliver to the property valuation
administrator, at the same time the notice required by paragraph (d) of this
subsection is sent, a list of the owners whose tax bills remain delinquent. The
property valuation administrator shall review this list in accordance with KRS
132.220 to establish that the properties on the list can be identified and
physically located; and
(f) Anytime after the expiration of the one (1) year tolling period established by
KRS 134.546, the county attorney or department may institute an action to
collect the amount due on a certificate of delinquency owned by the taxing
jurisdictions and in the possession of the county clerk. At least forty-five (45)
days before instituting a legal action, the county attorney or department shall
send, by regular mail, a notice of intent to initiate legal action to enforce the
lien. The notice shall be sent to the owner of record of the property or to the
in-care-of address or corrected address if either has been provided pursuant to
this section.
(5) If property subject to a certificate of delinquency has been transferred in any year
after the assessment date, the property valuation administrator shall determine the
in-care-of address supplied in the deed pursuant to KRS 382.135 and shall provide
that information to the county attorney or the department.
(6) (a) Failure of the county attorney or the department to mail the notices required in
subsection (4) of this section shall not affect the validity of the claim of the
state, county, school district, and taxing district. However, the county attorney
or the department shall not receive any compensation, commission, or
payment related to any certificate of delinquency for which the notices
Page 5 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
required by the provisions of subsection (4) of this section are not sent.
(b) For each notice mailed, one dollar ($1) shall be added to the amount of the
certificate of delinquency, to offset the cost of mailing, and, upon collection,
the county attorney or the department shall be paid the[such] amounts as
reimbursement for mailing costs.
(7) (a) As compensation for the collection duties performed pursuant to a contract
with the department, a county attorney shall be paid twenty percent (20%) of
the amount due each taxing unit during the contract period, whether the
amount is paid voluntarily, through sale, or under court order, and whether the
amount is paid to the county clerk or the county attorney. The fee for the
county attorney shall be added to the amount of the certificate of delinquency
and shall be paid by the person paying the certificate of delinquency.
(b) If payment in full is voluntarily made by the taxpayer to the county attorney
or county clerk within five (5) days of the filing of the tax claim with the
county clerk, the county attorney fee shall be waived.
(c) 1. If a county attorney files a court action or files a cross-claim, the county
attorney:
a. May collect actual, reasonable attorney's fees and costs that
arise due to the prosecution of collection remedies or the
protection of a certificate of delinquency that is involved in
litigation; and
b. Shall be paid an additional fee of thirteen percent (13%) of the
amount of the certificate of delinquency or[and] shall be
reimbursed for costs incident to the court action, whichever is
greater. The additional fee and costs incident to the litigation shall
be added to the certificate of delinquency and shall be paid by the
person paying the certificate of delinquency.
Page 6 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
2. For purposes of subparagraph 1.a .of this paragraph:
a. Actual attorney's litigation fees up to two thousand dollars
($2,000) may be reasonable if the fees are based upon
documented work performed at a rate commensurate with hourly
rates customarily charged by private attorneys in that
jurisdiction for similar services. A flat rate, without hours
documented for work performed, may be reasonable if the flat
fee is determined to be discounted from the usual and customary
rates for comparable work; and
b. Any attorney's litigation fee in excess of two thousand dollars
($2,000) shall be allowed if authorized by the court upon a
finding that the county attorney incurred actual attorney's
litigation fees in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) and that
those attorney's litigation fees were warranted based upon the
complexity of the issues presented in the litigation.
(d) If more than one (1) county attorney renders necessary services to collect on a
certificate of delinquency, the county attorney serving the last notice or
rendering the last substantial service preceding collection shall be entitled to
the fee.
(8) (a) The county attorney shall establish a system to accept installment payments
from delinquent taxpayers. The county attorney may, during the contract
period, enter into an agreement with a delinquent taxpayer to accept
installment payments on the certificates of delinquency. The agreement shall
not waive the county attorney's right to initiate court action or other
authorized collection activities if the taxpayer does not make payments in
accordance with the agreement.
(b) The county attorney may, upon written request of the taxpayer for good cause
Page 7 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
and with agreement of the affected taxing jurisdiction or fee recipient, waive
or reduce fees and penalties that are part of a certificate of delinquency during
settlement or negotiation with a taxpayer in accordance with guidance
provided by the department.
(9) Any action by the county attorney authorized by this chapter shall be filed on
relation of the commissioner. A copy of any judgment obtained by the county
attorney shall be sent to the department.
(10) (a) The county attorney shall notify the county clerk and the department of the
filing of a suit at the time the suit is filed and of payment agreements at the
time the[such] agreements are entered into. The county clerk shall note on the
certificate of delinquency the filing of the lawsuit or the existence of the
payment agreement, and these certificates of delinquency shall not be
available for purchase or payment by a third-party purchaser.
(b) The county attorney shall provide to the county clerk at least ten (10) days but
not more than twenty (20) days prior to the annual sale date for the county
established pursuant to KRS 134.128, a protected list of current year
certificates of delinquency that are:
1. Under a payment plan with the county attorney on which payments are
current;
2. Involved in litigation initiated by the county attorney or in which the
county attorney responds or files an answer;
3. Involved in bankruptcy litigation in which the county attorney has filed
a claim; or
4. Included on a list of protected properties submitted to the county
attorney by a vacant property review commission or an alternative
government entity as provided in KRS 99.727.
The list shall include sufficient detail for the county clerk to accurately
Page 8 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
identify the property.
(c) The county attorney shall notify the county clerk of the failure of any payment
agreement and, upon notification to the clerk, the certificate of delinquency
shall be available for purchase.
(11) The department may make its delinquent tax collection databases and other
technical resources, including but not limited to tax refund offsetting, available to
the county attorney upon request from the county attorney. The county attorney
seeking assistance shall enter into any agreements required by the department to
protect taxpayer confidentiality, to ensure database integrity, or to address the
concerns of the department.
(12) (a) If a county attorney chooses not to contract for collection duties, or if a county
attorney fails to perform the duties required by the contract, the department
shall assume responsibility for all uncollected certificates of delinquency and
personal property certificates of delinquency, including, at the option of the
department, those with pending court action or for which the county attorney
has entered into an installment payment agreement.
(b) If the department assumes or retains responsibility for the collection of
certificates of delinquency and personal property certificates of delinquency,
the twenty percent (20%) fee that would have been paid to the county attorney
under subsection (7) of this section, and any other fees or costs established by
this section for the county attorney shall be paid to the department for deposit
in the delinquent tax fund provided for under KRS 134.552.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 2 to 20 of this Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Land taxes" means general taxes on real property and includes the taxes both
on land and improvements thereon;
Page 9 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
(2) "Tax bill" means the statement of the land taxes and the lien thereon, levied and
assessed by any taxing authority; and
(3) "Tax lien" means the lien on any tax bill established under KRS 134.420.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
In addition to those powers granted to counties by statute for the collection of ad
valorem taxes, a county may enforce collection of any tax bill due to the county by the
procedure authorized in Sections 2 to 20 of this Act, except the statute of limitations
shall, in all cases, be that set forth in KRS 134.546.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As early as practicable in July of each year, the county clerk shall make a list of
all the tax bills remaining in whole or in part unpaid on the date due and payable
and file the list with the county treasurer. A false report or a failure to report
shall not invalidate subsequent proceedings for collection of the tax.
(2) The list of delinquent tax bills prepared under subsection (1) of this section shall
contain:
(a) A description of the land by district, block, lot, and sub-lot and include the
street address;
(b) A statement of the amount of each tax bill upon the parcel, including:
1. All tax bills which are delinquent;
2. The year of the assessment;
3. The block, lot, and sub-lot of each tax bill;
4. The date from which and the rate at which interest and penalties shall
be computed; and
5. An appropriate designation of the owner or holder of each tax bill;
and
Page 10 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
(c) The name of the last-known person appearing on the county's records in
whose name the tax bills were listed or charged for the year preceding the
calendar year in which the list is filed.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If any of the land or lots against which delinquent taxes are owed remain
unreleased or unpaid six (6) calendar months from the date due and payable, the
county may file suit in the Circuit Court against the land or lots to enforce the tax
lien.
(2) The county treasurer shall note on the tax bill the fact that suit has been
commenced.
(3) The county treasurer shall note on the list of tax bills prepared under Section 4 of
this Act each suit that has been filed under subsection (1) of this section
including:
(a) The land or lots against which the suit was filed;
(b) The court docket number; and
(c) The date the suit was commenced.
(4) It shall be a defense to an action for recovery of land taxes against real property
that the action was not commenced within eleven (11) years after delinquency.
(5) Any person interested in, or the owner of any tract of land or lot contained in, the
county's records of delinquent tax bills may release the tract of land or lot, or any
part thereof, from the county's lien thereon by paying the land taxes due to the
county, together with interest from the date of delinquency.
(6) If suit has commenced against any tract of land or lot for the collection of land
taxes, the person desiring to have the land released before judgment, in addition
to the original taxes, interest, and costs, including attorney's fees, shall pay to the
county all necessary costs incurred in the court where the suit is pending, and the
Page 11 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
county shall account to the clerk of the court in which the suit is filed for the
court costs collected.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The county may enforce county tax liens by bringing suit in rem against property
so encumbered. This means of enforcement shall not be the exclusive remedy
available to the county and shall be in addition to all other remedies available at
law or equity. Any number of parcels of real estate may be joined in one (1)
petition or suit. Each separate tract or parcel of real estate joined in any one (1)
action shall be included in a separate count to distinguish it from other parcels
within the same action.
(2) Each separate tract or parcel of real estate joined in any one (1) action shall be
listed by the county by its tax district, block, lot, and sub-lot and shall be
separately indexed and docketed by the Circuit Court clerk in a book kept by the
clerk for that purpose. For each parcel of real estate, the Circuit Court clerk shall
be allowed a fee of fifty cents ($0.50) which shall be taxed and paid as other costs.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A suit for the enforcement of the tax liens brought under Sections 2 to 20 of this
Act shall be instituted by filing with the Circuit Court clerk a petition, containing
a caption in substantially the following form:
______________Circuit Court
__________Division
No. ___________
County of ______________Plaintiff
VS.
___________Parcels of Land Encumbered
Page 12 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
with Delinquent Tax Liens Defendants
(2) The petition shall contain a separate count for each parcel of real estate included
in the action. Each count in the petition shall set forth those items of information
required of the county in subsection (2) of Section 4 of this Act and shall list the
name of any taxing authority or person of record owning or holding any tax bill
or claiming any right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, any parcel of real
estate as set out in the petition, and a claim. The specific right, title, or interest
either owned or claimed, or lien held, by any taxing authority other than the
county or by other interested persons of record need not be set forth in the action.
(3) The petition shall conclude with a claim that:
(a) All county tax liens upon the real estate be enforced;
(b) The court determine the amounts and priorities of all tax bills, together with
interest, penalties and costs;
(c) The court order the real estate to be sold by the master commissioner under
KRS 426.560 to 426.715, except as otherwise provided in Section 11 of this
Act; and
(d) A report of the sale be made by the master commissioner to the court for
further proceedings under Sections 2 to 20 of this Act.
(4) The petition so filed shall have the same effect, with respect to each parcel of real
estate described, as a separate suit instituted to enforce the tax lien against any
one (1) of the parcels of real estate. The invalidity of any separate count shall not
in any way affect the validity of the remainder of the proceedings with respect to
any other count in the action.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any action brought under this section or Section 6, 7, 9, 10, or 11 of this Act shall
constitute an action in rem and the pleadings therein shall consist of a petition
Page 13 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
and an answer.
(2) An answer may be filed by any person or taxing authority owning or claiming
any right, title, or interest in or to any tax bill constituting a tax lien on the real
estate described in the petition or by any person owning or claiming any right,
title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, the real estate. An answer shall include the
nature and amount of the interest and any defense or objection to the
enforcement of the tax liens listed in the petitions, and may include the
allegations usually incorporated by the appropriate pleadings.
(3) An answer shall contain the caption and number of the case, and the count
number or numbers, as set out in the petition, of the parcels of real estate
concerned. The answer shall be filed with the Circuit Court clerk and a copy
thereof served on the county not later than fifty (50) days after the date of the first
publication of the notice of enforcement.
(4) In the event of failure to answer within the fifty (50) day period, a default
judgment may be taken on all parcels of real estate for which no answer has been
filed.
(5) Any taxing authority owning or claiming any interest, right, or title in or to any
tax bill described in the petition filed under Section 7 of this Act may either file a
cross-claim or join the action as a co-plaintiff under Sections 2 to 20 of this Act,
notwithstanding KRS Chapter 134.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Within thirty (30) days after the filing with the Circuit Court clerk of an
enforcement suit for the collection of unpaid taxes under Sections 2 to 20 of this
Act, the county shall cause a notice of enforcement to be published two (2) times,
once each week, during successive weeks, and on the same day of each week,
otherwise in accordance with KRS Chapter 424.
Page 14 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
(2) The notice shall be in substantially the following form:
NOTICE OF ENFORCEMENT OF LIEN FOR DELINQUENT LAND TAXES BY
ACTION IN REM
Public Notice is hereby given that on the ______ day of _________, 20_____,
___________ County, Kentucky, filed a petition, being Action Number _________, in
the Circuit Court of _________ County, Kentucky, for the enforcement of liens for
delinquent land taxes against the real estate situated in the county, all as described in
the petition.
The object of the suit is to obtain from the court a judgment enforcing the county's tax
and other liens against the real estate and ordering the sale of the real estate for the
satisfaction of the liens thereon (except right of redemption in favor of the United
States of America, if any), including principal, interest, penalties, and costs. Action is
being brought against the real estate only and no personal judgment shall be entered
therein.
The count number assigned by the county to each parcel of real estate, a
description of each parcel by street address and the property valuation administrator's
tax parcel number (district, block, lot, and sub-lot), a statement of the total principal
amount of all delinquent county tax bills against each parcel of real estate, all of
which, as to each parcel, is more fully set out and mentioned by count in the aforesaid
petition, and the name of any taxing authority or person of record owning or holding
any tax bill or claiming any right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, any parcel of
real estate as set out in the petition, are respectively as follows:
(Here set out the respective count numbers, property descriptions, names of taxpayers
of record and statements of total principal amounts of tax bills, and names of those
other interested persons of record next above referred to.)
The total principal amounts of delinquent taxes set out in this notice do not
include the lawful interest, penalties, and costs which have accrued against the
Page 15 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
respective parcels of real estate.
Any person or taxing authority owning or holding any tax bill or claiming any
right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, any parcel of real estate must file an
answer to the suit in the office of the Circuit Court clerk of _________ County in
_________, and a copy of the answer with the county of __________ in accordance
with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure, on or before the _____ day of _________,
20_____, and in the answer shall set forth in detail the nature and the amount of
interest and any defense or objection to the enforcement of the tax liens, or any
affirmative relief the person or taxing authority may be entitled to assert with respect
thereto.
Any person having any right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, any parcel of
real estate may have the county's claims against the parcel dismissed from the action
by paying all of the sums mentioned therein to the county of __________ including
principal, interest, penalties, and costs then due, at any time prior to the enforcement
sale of the real estate by the master commissioner.
In the event of failure to answer on or before the date herein fixed as the last day
for filing answer in the suit, by any person having the right to answer, the person shall
be forever barred and foreclosed as to any defense or objection he or she might have to
the enforcement of the liens for delinquent taxes and the judgment of enforcement may
be taken by default. Redemption may be made for a period of sixty (60) days after the
master commissioner's enforcement sale, if the sale price is less than the parcel's
current assessed value as certified by the Department of Revenue. Each person having
any right, title, or interest in or to, or any lien upon, any parcel of real estate described
in the petition so failing to answer or redeem, as aforesaid, shall be forever barred and
foreclosed of any right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, or any equity of
redemption in the real estate.
__________County, Kentucky
Page 16 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
(name of county)
_________________
Attorney
_________________
_________________
_________________
Address
_________________
Phone
_________________
Date of first publication
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The county shall also cause to be prepared and mailed by first class mail, certified
by a United States postal service certificate of mailing, within thirty (30) days
after the filing of the petition, a brief notice of the filing of the suit to any taxing
authority or person of record owning or holding any tax bills or claiming any
right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, any parcel of real estate as set out in
the petition.
(2) The notice shall be substantially as follows:
To the person to whom this notice is addressed:
Public records indicate that you may own or claim some right, title, or interest in
or to, or hold a lien upon a certain parcel of real estate located at (here insert the street
address and the property valuation administrator's tax parcel number) and set out in
count number _____ in a certain petition bearing Action No. _______ filed in the
Circuit Court of ________ County, Kentucky on _________, 20_____, wherein an
enforcement of the liens of various delinquent tax bills is sought and a court order
Page 17 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
asked for the purpose of selling the real estate at a public sale for payment of all
delinquent tax bills, together with interest, penalties, and costs. Publication of notice of
enforcement was commenced on the _____ day of ________, 20_____.
Public records in the office of the county clerk or other public office indicate you
may own or claim some interest in this parcel by reason of (Here insert specific
reference to any public document of record as disclosed in a thorough examination of
title status.).
Unless all delinquent county taxes are paid upon the parcel of real estate
described in the petition and unless the owners of the real estate shall either have
discharged any county tax liens or satisfied any judgment rendered on the liens in
favor of the county, prior to the time of the enforcement sale of the real estate by the
master commissioner, or within sixty (60) days after the sale if the purchase price at
sale is less than the parcel's certified assessed value, the owner or any taxing authority
or person of record claiming any right, title, or interest in or to, or lien upon, any
parcel of real estate shall be forever barred and foreclosed of all right, title and interest
and equity of redemption in and to the parcel of real estate; provided, however, that
any person shall have the right to file an answer in the suit on or before the ______
day of ________, 20____, in the office of the Circuit Court clerk and copy thereof to
_________ County, in accordance with the Kentucky rules of civil procedure, setting
forth in detail the nature and amount of the interest and any defense or objection to the
enforcement.
Dated ____________, 20__________________County, Kentucky
(Name of county)
___________________
Attorney
___________________
___________________
Page 18 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
___________________
Address
___________________
Phone
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The court shall order the master commissioner to sell, under KRS 426.560 to
426.715, except as otherwise provided in this section, each parcel separately by
individual count number. The court shall further order that a report of the sale be
made by the master commissioner to the court for further proceedings under
Sections 2 to 20 of this Act.
(2) Prior to the master commissioner's setting each parcel for sale pursuant to court
order, the county shall file with the Circuit Court clerk an affidavit as to the most
recent certified tax assessment of each parcel to be sold. The most recent certified
assessment of a property shall be the property valuation administrator's last
assessment which shall have been certified by the Department of Revenue to the
county clerk, as required by KRS 133.180.
(3) The most recent certified assessment as sworn to in the affidavit furnished by the
county shall be used in all actions brought under Sections 2 to 20 of this Act to
determine the owner's equity of redemption under subsection (2) of Section 15 of
this Act.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Affidavits of publication of notice and of posting, mailing, or other acts required by
Sections 2 to 20 of this Act shall be filed in the office of the Circuit Court Clerk prior to
the trial, and when so filed shall constitute part of the evidentiary document in the
enforcement suit. The affidavits shall be prima facie evidence of the performance of
Page 19 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
acts therein described, and may be so used in the trial of the suit unless challenged by
verified answer duly filed in the suit.
SECTION 13. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any suit to collect delinquent tax bills which may be pending at the time of the
commencement of any suit brought under Sections 2 to 20 of this Act, affecting
the same land, shall be consolidated with the suit brought under Sections 2 to 20
of this Act. The parties to the pending suit shall file answers, but any tax bill
sought to be collected in any pending suit may be included in any list included as
a part of any petition filed by the county. If so included, the inclusion shall act as
an abatement of any pending suit, and all amounts then due on any tax bill,
including interest, penalties, and costs, shall be listed and charged, and shall
continue in force the liens against the respective parcel of real estate listed in the
petition filed under Sections 2 to 20 of this Act.
(2) Any suit described in subsection (1) of this section shall be tried as all other
actions, and the statute of limitations shall not prevent the parties to the pending
suit from asserting all rights and defenses which they then have.
(3) Any cross-claim of a taxing authority under Sections 2 to 20 of this Act may
include a claim for the immediate enforcement of any ad valorem tax owed to the
taxing authority, notwithstanding KRS Chapter 134.
SECTION 14. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
After the trial of the issues, the court shall render judgment as promptly as
circumstances permit. If the court finds that no tax bill was delinquent when the suit
was instituted or tried, the judgment of the court shall be that the cause be dismissed as
to the parcels of real estate described in the tax bill. If the evidence warrants, the
judgment may be for the principal amount of the tax bill upon which the suit was
Page 20 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
brought, together with interest, penalties, and court costs computed as of the date of the
judgment. The court may decree that the lien upon the parcel of real estate described in
the tax bill be enforced and the real estate be sold by the master commissioner and the
cost continued for further proceedings as provided by Sections 2 to 20 of this Act.
SECTION 15. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) At any time prior to the sale of the property, any person having any right, title, or
interest in, or lien upon, any parcel of real estate described in the petition may
discharge any county lien or satisfy a judgment in favor of the county as to the
parcel of real estate by paying to the county all of the sums mentioned therein,
including the principal, interest, penalties, and costs then due.
(2) If the property is sold pursuant to the judgment or order of the court and does not
bring its most recent assessed value certified by the Department of Revenue to the
county clerk as required by KRS 133.180, the owner may redeem it within sixty
(60) days from the day of the sale by paying the purchaser the original purchase
money and interest at eighteen percent (18%) per annum. Any owner who
redeems his or her land shall take a receipt from the purchaser and lodge it with
the clerk of the court. The receipt shall be entered upon the records of the court.
(3) The owner may tender the redemption money to the purchaser or the purchaser's
agent or attorney, if found in the county where the land lies or in the county in
which the judgment was obtained or order of sale made. If the money is refused,
or if the purchaser does not reside in either of the counties, the owner may,
before the expiration of the right of redemption, go to the clerk of the court in
which the judgment was rendered or the order made, and make affidavit of the
tender and refusal, or that the purchaser or his or her agent or attorney do not
reside in either of the counties. The owner may then pay to the clerk the
redemption money, and the clerk shall give receipt therefor and file the affidavit
Page 21 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
among the papers of the action.
(4) When the right of redemption exists, the owner may remain in possession of the
property until it expires. Real property sold shall not be conveyed to the purchaser
until the right of redemption has expired. If it is redeemed, the sale shall, from
and after the redemption or from and after the deposit of the redemption money
with the clerk, be null and void.
(5) In the event of failure to redeem within the period provided for redemption, the
owner or any other party in interest shall be barred forever of all right, title, and
interest in and to the parcel of real estate described in the petition.
(6) Upon redemption as permitted by this section, the person redeeming shall be
entitled to a certificate of redemption from the county describing the property in
the same manner as it is described in the petition and the county shall thereupon
note on his or her records the word "redeemed" and the date of the payment
opposite the description of the parcel of real estate.
SECTION 16. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Upon the confirmation of the sale by the court and the expiration of the right of
redemption provided in Section 15 of this Act, the title to any real estate
purchased from the master commissioner under Sections 2 to 20 of this Act shall
vest in the purchaser. The title of the real estate shall be an absolute estate in fee
simple, subject to rights-of-way of public utilities on which tax has been otherwise
paid and subject to any right of redemption of the United States of America, if
any. All persons, including the Commonwealth of Kentucky, infants,
incompetents, absentees, and nonresidents who may have had any right, title,
interest, claim, or equity of redemption in or to, or lien upon the land shall be
barred of all right, title, interest, claim, lien, or equity of redemption, and the
court shall order that immediate possession of the real estate be given to the
Page 22 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
purchaser. Any person so barred shall thereafter have as his or her exclusive
remedy a claim for a share of the proceeds of the sale of the real estate by the
master commissioner.
(2) The title shall be subject to the liens of any tax bill which may have attached to
the parcel of real estate prior to the time of the filing of the petition affecting the
parcel of real estate not then delinquent, or which may have attached after the
filing of the petition and prior to the expiration of the period provided for
redemption and not including any answer to the petition.
(3) If the parcel of real estate is sold to the county or to a land bank authority created
under KRS 65.350 to 65.375, the title shall be free of any liens to the extent of the
interest of any taxing authority in any of the real estate.
(4) The title shall not be subject to the lien of special tax bills, which have attached to
the parcel of real estate, but the lien of the special tax bill shall attach to the
proceeds of the master commissioner's sale or to the proceeds of the ultimate sale
of the parcel by the county.
(5) Failure of any party other than the purchaser to follow the procedures set out in
Sections 2 to 20 of this Act shall not affect the vesting of title in the purchaser.
SECTION 17. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) After the master commissioner sells any parcel of real estate, the court shall,
upon its own motion or upon motion of any interested party, set the cause down
for hearing to confirm the sale, even though the parcels are not all of the parcels
of real estate described in the notice of the master commissioner's sale.
(2) If the sale is confirmed, the court shall order the proceeds of the sale applied in
the following order:
(a) To the payment of all costs, including court costs, publication costs, and
costs otherwise associated with the action and sale of the parcel described in
Page 23 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
the particular count; and
(b) To the payment of all tax bills on the property, including principal, interest,
and penalties. If after the payment there is any sum remaining of the
proceeds of the commissioner's sale of the property, the court shall try and
determine the other issues in the suit with respect to that particular count. If
any of the answering parties has specifically appealed, the court, provided
that the answering parties have, prior to the appeal, executed an appropriate
supersedeas bond, shall retain custody of the funds pending disposition of
the appeal, and upon disposition of the appeal shall make distribution. If
there are not sufficient proceeds of the sale to pay all claims in any class
described, the court shall order them to be paid in accordance with the
priorities.
(3) If there are any funds remaining of the proceeds after the commissioner's sale
and after the distribution of the funds as set out in this section and no person
entitled to any funds, whether or not a party to the suit, shall have appeared
within two (2) years after the sale and claimed the funds, the funds shall escheat
to the state as provided in KRS Chapter 393.
SECTION 18. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The county, any interested person, or anyone on behalf of a person who is declared
incompetent may appeal from the judgment confirming or disapproving the
commissioner's sale and the distribution of proceeds. No questions may be raised upon
the appeal that could have been raised upon an appeal from the judgment of the sale.
The appeals shall be taken within thirty (30) days after the date of the judgment. The
necessity for giving bond and the provisions thereof shall be the same as in the case of
appeal from the judgment of sale.
SECTION 19. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
Page 24 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1045
READ AS FOLLOWS:
If any party redeems any parcel of real estate from the lien of any tax bill, the party
shall, in addition to all other amounts then due, including principal, interest, and costs,
also pay costs to the county as follows:
(1) One dollar ($1) per parcel of real estate for issuance of certificate of redemption;
(2) Five dollars ($5) per parcel of real estate, if notice of publication has been
commenced; and
(3) Five dollars ($5) as an additional charge per parcel of real estate if notice of the
commissioner's sale has been commenced.
SECTION 20. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 68 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Any property or real estate acquired by the county by virtue of purchase at the
commissioner's sale shall be held by the county and any property so held may be sold,
transferred, leased, or otherwise utilized by the county within its sole discretion.
Page 25 of 25
XXXX 1/8/2025 10:56 AM Jacketed